Hawaii statutes.
§150A-6.1 Plant import. (a) The board
shall maintain a list of restricted plants that require a permit for entry into
the State. Restricted plants or any portion thereof shall not be imported into
the State without a permit issued pursuant to rules.

(b) The department shall designate, by rule,
as restricted plants, specific plants that may be detrimental or potentially
harmful to agriculture, horticulture, the environment, or animal or public
health, or that spread or may be likely to spread an infestation or infection
of an insect, pest, or disease that is detrimental or potentially harmful to
agriculture, horticulture, the environment, or animal or public health. In
addition, plant species designated by rule as noxious weeds are designated as
restricted plants.

(c) The department may regulate or prohibit
the sale of specific plants on the list of restricted plants by rule.

(d) Noxious weeds may be imported only for
research, by permit, and shall not be offered for sale or sold in the State.

(e) No person shall import, offer for sale, or
sell within the State any plant or propagative portion of Salvinia molesta or
Salvinia minima and Pistia stratiotes. [L 2000, c 211, pt of §1; am L 2003, c
85, §9; am L 2004, c 10, §16; am L 2008, c 40, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next